Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1446.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-423.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-423.01. Outpatient treatment centers; dialysis services; social workers; documentation tHE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A social worker who is employed by an outpatient treatment center that is authorized to provide dialysis services to document the progress of a patient who receives dialysis services in the patient's medical record MORE FREQUENTLY THAN ON A QUARTERLY BASIS UNLESS OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND medicaid SERVICES TO MEET THE NEEDS OF THE PATIENT.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.